Utah statutes.
38-8-5.   Other liens unaffected.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as in any manner impairing or affecting the right of parties to create liens by special contract or agreement, nor shall it in any manner affect or impair other liens arising at common law or in equity, or by any statute of this state.

